Illinois, session 104th, HB3013.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Foster care credit.8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92025, there shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 10by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an 11amount equal to the foster care expenses paid or incurred, not 12to exceed $1,000 in any taxable year, for each qualifying 13dependent child legally cared for by the foster care parent in 14Illinois. The tax credit under this Section may be claimed for 15the taxable year in which the foster care parent becomes the 16legal guardian of a foster child. The taxpayer must be under 17contract with the Department of Children and Family Services 18and providing care to the qualifying dependent child for at 19least 6 months during the taxable year to receive the full 20credit. If the taxpayer is under contract with the Department 21of Children and Family Services and providing care to the 22qualifying dependent child for less than 6 months during the 23taxable year, then the taxpayer is entitled to a credit in an   HB3013- 2 -LRB104 09198 HLH 19255 b1amount equal to: the lesser of (i) the foster care expenses 2paid or incurred by the taxpayer or (ii) $1,000; multiplied by 3a fraction the numerator of which is the number of days during 4the taxable year during which the taxpayer is under contract 5with the Department of Children and Family Services and 6providing care to the qualifying dependent child and the 7denominator of which is 365. 8    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 9taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the taxpayer's 10federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year does not 11exceed $50,000, then the excess credit amount shall be 12refunded to the taxpayer. The amount of the refund shall not be 13included in the taxpayer's income or resources for the 14purposes of determining the taxpayer's eligibility or benefit 15level for any means-tested benefit program administered by a 16governmental entity unless required by federal law. If the 17taxpayer has a federal adjusted gross income for the taxable 18year that is $50,000 or more, then the excess credit amount 19shall be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for 20the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 21credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 22a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 23that are available to offset liability, the earlier credit 24shall be applied first. 25    (c) The Department of Children and Family Services, in 26collaboration with the Department of Revenue, shall adopt any   HB3013- 3 -LRB104 09198 HLH 19255 b1necessary rules to implement this Section. 2    (d) As used in this Section, "qualifying dependent child" 3means a person who is an Illinois resident in the custody of 4the Department of Children and Family Services who is the 5foster child of the taxpayer seeking a credit under this 6Section. 7    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 8250.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.